Maryland, session 2025, HB1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1261*

HOUSE BILL 1261
20–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(L) “UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE” MEANS AN ACT THAT IS
PROHIBITED UNDER § 20–606 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
20–602.
It is the policy of the State, in the exercise of its police power for the protection of the
public safety, public health, and general welfare, for the maintenance of business and good
government, and for the promotion of the State’s trade, commerce, and manufacturers:
(1) to assure all persons equal opportunity in receiving employment and in
all labor management–union relations, regardless of race, color, religion, ancestry or
national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military
status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the
performance of the employment; and
(2) to that end, to prohibit discrimination OR ACTS THAT HAVE A
DISCRIMINATORY EFFECT, REGARDLESS OF THE ACTOR’S INTENT, in employment by
any person.
20–606.
(a) An employer may not:
(1) fail or refuse to hire, discharge, or otherwise discriminate against any
individual with respect to the individual’s compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment because of:
(i) the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, military status, or
disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of
the employment; or
(ii) the individual’s refusal to submit to a genetic test or make
available the results of a genetic test;
(2) limit, segregate, or classify its employees or applicants for employment
in any way that would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the individual’s status as an employee because
of:
(i) the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, military status, or

HOUSE BILL 1261 3
disability unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of
the employment; or
(ii) the individual’s refusal to submit to a genetic test or make
available the results of a genetic test;
(3) request or require genetic tests or genetic information as a condition of
hiring or determining benefits;
(4) fail or refuse to make a reasonable accommodation for the known
disability of an otherwise qualified employee or an applicant for employment; or
(5) engage in harassment of an employee.
(b) An employment agency may not:
(1) fail or refuse to refer for employment or otherwise discriminate against
any individual because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin,
marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability unrelated
in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the employment; or
(2) classify or refer for employment any individual on the basis of the
individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability unrelated in nature and extent
so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the employment.
(c) A labor organization may not:
(1) exclude or expel from its membership, or otherwise discriminate
against, any individual because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability
unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the
employment;
(2) limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or classify or fail or refuse
to refer for employment any individual, in any way that would deprive or tend to deprive
the individual of employment opportunities, limit the individual’s employment
opportunities, or otherwise adversely affect the individual’s status as an employee or as an
applicant for employment because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability
unrelated in nature and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the
employment; or
(3) cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an
individual in violation of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1261
(d) An employer, labor organization, or joint labor–management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs, including on–the–job
training programs, may not discriminate against any individual in admission to, or
employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training or
retraining because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital
status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability unrelated in nature
and extent so as to reasonably preclude the performance of the employment.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an employer,
labor organization, or employment agency may not print or cause to be printed or published
any notice or advertisement relating to employment by the employer, membership in or any
classification or referral for employment by the labor organization, or any classification or
referral for employment by the employment agency that indicates any preference,
limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, age, national
origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or military status.
(2) A notice or advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation,
specification, or discrimination based on religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status,
disability, or military status if religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, disability,
or military status is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.
(f) An employer may not discriminate or retaliate against any of its employees or
applicants for employment, an employment agency may not discriminate against any
individual, and a labor organization may not discriminate or retaliate against any member
or applicant for membership because the individual has:
(1) opposed any practice prohibited by this subtitle; or
(2) made a charge, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an
investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this subtitle.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON
MAY NOT ACT IN A MANNER, REGARDLESS OF INTENT, THAT HAS A DISCRIMINATORY
EFFECT AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL IN RELATION TO AN ACT PROHIBITED UNDER THIS
SECTION BECAUSE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RACE, COLOR, RELIGION, SEX, AGE,
NATIONAL ORIGIN, MARITAL STATUS, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY,
DISABILITY, OR MILITARY STATUS.
(2) A PERSON WHO, WITHOUT DISCRIMINATORY INTENT, VIOLATES
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION HAS NOT COMMITTED AN UNLAWFUL
EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE IF:
(I) THE VIOLATION WAS JUSTIFIED BY A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS
NECESSITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1261 5
(II) THERE WAS NO OTHER LESS DISCRIMINATORY MEANS OF
ACCOMPLISHING THAT BUSINESS NECESSITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.